Virginia statutes. Title 57. Religious and Charitable Matters; Cemeteries.
Chapter 5. Solicitation of Contributions.
§ 57-57.
Prohibited acts.

No charitable organization shall use or exploit the fact of registration under this chapter so as to lead the public to believe that such registration in any manner constitutes an endorsement or approval by this Commonwealth. The use of the following statement shall not be deemed a prohibited exploitation, “Registered with the Commissioner as required by law. Registration does not imply endorsement of a public solicitation for contributions.”

No person shall, in connection with the solicitation of contributions or the sale of tangible personal property or services represent, or lead anyone by any manner, means, practice or device whatsoever to believe, that the person on whose behalf such solicitation or sale is being conducted is a bona fide charitable organization or that the proceeds of such solicitation or sale will be used for charitable purposes, if he has reason to believe such not to be the fact.

No person shall, in connection with the solicitation of contributions or the sale of tangible personal property or services for charitable purposes, represent or lead anyone by any manner, means, practice or device whatsoever to believe, that any other person sponsors or endorses such solicitation of contributions, sale of tangible personal property or services for charitable purposes or approves of such charitable purposes or a charitable organization connected therewith when such other person has not given written consent to the use of his name for these purposes.Any member of the board of directors or trustees of a charitable organization or any other person who has agreed either to serve or to participate in any voluntary capacity in the campaign shall be deemed thereby to have given his consent to the use of his name in said campaign. Nothing contained in this section shall prevent the publication of names of contributors without their written consents, in an annual or other periodic report issued by a charitable organization for the purpose of reporting on its operations and affairs to its membership or for the purpose of reporting contributions to contributors.

No person shall denominate any membership fee or purchase price of goods or services sold, as a contribution or as a donation or in any other manner represent or imply that the member or the purchaser of such goods or services will be entitled to an income tax deduction for his cost or any portion thereof unless:

A signed opinion of counsel or an Internal Revenue Service ruling or determination letter holding such cost to be deductible has been obtained; or

The member or purchaser is informed in writing that such cost may not be deductible.No person shall represent or imply that a contributor will be entitled to an income tax deduction for his contribution unless a signed opinion of counsel or an Internal Revenue Service ruling or determination letter holding gifts to such organization to be deductible has been obtained.

No person shall make any representation that he is soliciting contributions for or on behalf of a charitable or civic organization or shall use or display any emblem, device or printed matter belonging to or associated with a charitable or civic organization for the purpose of soliciting or inducing contributions from the public without first being authorized to do so by the charitable or civic organization.

No professional solicitor shall solicit in the name of or on behalf of any charitable or civic organization unless such solicitor has:

Written authorization of two officers of such organization, a copy of which shall be filed with the Commissioner. Such written authorization shall bear the signature of the solicitor and shall expressly state on its face the period for which it is valid, which shall not exceed one year from the date issued.

Such authorization with him when making solicitations and exhibits it on request to persons solicited, police officers, or agents of the Commissioner.

No charitable or civic organization shall accept any contribution exceeding $5 in cash or tangible property without providing, on request of the donor, a written receipt acknowledging such contribution on behalf of the organization.

No person, and no organization of which such person is an officer, professional fund-raising counsel or professional solicitor, shall solicit within this Commonwealth if:

Such person has been convicted in any jurisdiction of embezzlement, larceny or other crime involving the obtaining of money or property by false pretenses or the misapplication of funds impressed with a trust, unless such person has received a pardon for such offense or the public is informed of such conviction in a manner approved in writing by the Commissioner before any solicitation occurs; or

Such person has ever been enjoined by any court or otherwise prohibited from soliciting in any jurisdiction, unless the Commissioner first determines in writing that such person is entitled to solicit in such jurisdiction at the time of soliciting within this Commonwealth or that the reason for such injunction or prohibition does not involve moral turpitude.

No person shall solicit within this Commonwealth for the benefit of any other person located without the Commonwealth, if such other person refuses to supply any information which the Commissioner deems necessary to assure himself that the provisions of this chapter are complied with. A solicitation shall be deemed to be on behalf of every person who or which receives, directly or indirectly, more than 10 percent of the gross amount collected.

No charitable or civic organization shall allow a professional solicitor to solicit on its behalf if the professional solicitor has not registered pursuant to §

57-61

.

No charitable or civic organization, professional fund-raising counsel or professional solicitor shall solicit in this Commonwealth without being duly registered or granted the appropriate exempt status under this chapter.

No person shall employ in any solicitation or collection of contributions for a charitable purpose any device, scheme or artifice to defraud or obtain money or property by any misrepresentation or misleading statement.

No officer, agent, director or trustee of any charitable or civic organization, professional fund-raising counsel or professional solicitor shall refuse or fail, after notice, to produce to the Commissioner any books and records of such organization.

No person shall use or permit the use of the funds raised by a charitable solicitation for any purpose other than the solicited purpose or, with respect to funds raised by general appeals, the general purposes of the charitable or civic organization on whose behalf the solicitation was made.

No person shall knowingly and willfully make any false statements in any registration application or statement, report or other disclosure required by this chapter.

No professional solicitor shall solicit on behalf of a charitable or civic organization unless the charitable or civic organization has registered or been granted the appropriate exempt status under this chapter.

No person shall represent, in any solicitation, that tickets to events will be donated for use by another unless he complies with the following requirements:

He shall have obtained commitments, in writing, from persons or charitable or civic organizations stating that they will accept donated tickets and specifying the number of persons for whom they are willing to accept tickets;

He shall not collect or accept more contributions for donated tickets than the number of ticket commitments he has received from persons or charitable or civic organizations;

He shall have printed in advance on each ticket the exact number of persons to be admitted by the ticket and the dollar price or value of each ticket;

He shall distribute the tickets in a timely fashion to those having given commitments; and

He shall maintain during the solicitation and for a period of three years thereafter: (i) records reflecting the name and address of each contributor and the amount of money and number of tickets donated by each such contributor; and (ii) the written commitments of each person or charitable or civic organization to accept tickets and specifying the number of persons on whose behalf tickets were to be accepted, as required in subdivision 1 of subsection Q of this section.

No person shall knowingly use or permit the use of funds raised by a solicitation or by contribution to benefit or provide support, directly or indirectly, in cash or in kind, to terrorists, terrorist organizations, terrorist activities or to family members of any terrorist.

History.

1974, c. 574; 1979, c. 595; 1983, c. 374; 1987, c. 561; 1988, c. 322; 1990, c. 711; 2003, cc. 977, 1009.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 977 and 1009 are identical, and substituted “$5” for “five dollars” in subsection G; and added subsection R.

Law Review.

For essay, “The Will to Prevail: Inside the Legal Battle to Save Sweet Briar,” see 51 U. Rich. L. Rev. 227 (2016).

§ 57-58.
Ratio of fund-raising expenses to contributions to be included in registration statement.

Each charitable organization shall, as a part of its registration statement, compute the percentage that its fund-raising expenses for its preceding fiscal year bore to its support received directly from the public during such year.

Each federated fund-raising organization shall clearly disclose on any registration the percentage that is withheld from a donation designated for a member agency.

History.

1974, c. 574; 2003, c. 810.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 810 substituted “that” for “which” in the first paragraph and added the second paragraph.

§ 57-59.
Enforcement of chapter; seizure of property connected with terrorism; penalties.

Any person who willfully and knowingly violates or causes to be violated any provision of this chapter, or who willfully and knowingly gives false or incorrect information to the Commissioner in filing statements or reports required by this chapter, whether such report or statement is verified or not, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished for the first offense by a fine of not less than $100 and not more than $1,000 or by confinement in jail for not more than six months, or both, and for the second and any subsequent offense by a fine of not less than $500 and not more than $2,500 or by confinement in jail for not more than one year, or both.The following property shall be subject to lawful seizure by any law-enforcement officer charged with enforcing the provisions of this chapter: all moneys or other property, real or personal, together with any interest or profits derived from the investment of such money and used in substantial connection with an act of terrorism as defined in §

18.2-46.4

. All seizures and forfeitures under this section shall be governed by the procedures contained in Chapter 22.1 (§

19.2-386.1

et seq.) of Title 19.2.

Whenever the Commissioner has reasonable cause to believe that a violation of this chapter may have occurred, the Commissioner, upon his own motion or upon complaint of any person, may investigate any charitable or civic organization, commercial co-venturer, professional fund-raising counsel or professional solicitor to determine whether such charitable or civic organization, commercial co-venturer, professional fund-raising counsel or professional solicitor has violated the provisions of this chapter. In the conduct of such investigation, the Commissioner may:

Require or permit any person to file a statement in writing, under oath or otherwise as the Commissioner determines, as to all facts and circumstances concerning the matter to be investigated.

Administer oaths or affirmations and, upon his motion or upon request of any party, subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, take evidence, and require the production of any matter which is relevant to the investigation, including the existence, description, nature, custody, condition, and location of any books, documents, or other tangibles and the identity and location of persons having knowledge of relevant facts or any other matter reasonably calculated to lead to the discovery of material evidence.Any proceedings or hearings by the Commissioner under this chapter, where witnesses are subpoenaed and their attendance is required for evidence to be taken or any matter is to be produced to ascertain material evidence, shall take place within the City of Richmond.Upon failure to obey a subpoena and upon reasonable notice to all persons affected thereby, the Commissioner may apply to the Circuit Court of the City of Richmond for an order imposing punishment for contempt of the subpoena or compelling compliance.

Whenever the Attorney General has reasonable cause to believe that any person has operated, is operating or is about to operate in violation of the provisions of this chapter, the Attorney General may issue a civil investigative demand. The provisions of § 59.1-9.10 shall apply mutatis mutandis to civil investigative demands issued pursuant to this subsection.

Whenever the Attorney General, or any attorney for the Commonwealth or the attorney for any city, county or town has reason to believe that any charitable or civic organization, commercial co-venturer, professional fund-raising counsel or professional solicitor has operated, is operating or is about to operate in violation of the provisions of this chapter, the Attorney General, attorney for the Commonwealth or the attorney for any city, county or town, in addition to all other actions authorized by law, may bring an action in the name of the Commonwealth against such charitable or civic organization, commercial co-venturer, professional fund-raising counsel or professional solicitor, or their officers, directors, or other agents to enjoin the continuation of such violation, solicitation or collection, or the engaging therein, or the conducting of any acts in furtherance thereof and for such other relief as the court deems appropriate.

In any action brought under subsection D, the court may also award to the Commonwealth a civil penalty of not more than $5,000 per violation, to be paid to the Literary Fund, reasonable expenses incurred by the state or local agency in investigating and preparing the case, not to exceed $250 per violation, and attorney’s fees. Such expenses and attorney’s fees shall be paid into the general fund of the Commonwealth or of the county, city, or town which such attorney represented.

History.

1974, c. 574; 1979, c. 595; 1983, c. 374; 1987, c. 561; 1990, c. 711; 1991, c. 710; 1999, c. 81; 2000, c. 755; 2003, cc. 576, 977, 1009.

The 1999 amendment,

in the first sentence of subsection C, substituted “solicitor has operated, is operating or is about to operate in” for “solicitor is operating in”; in subsection D, divided the former provisions into two sentences by substituting “and attorney’s fees. Such expenses and attorney’s fees shall” for “and such expenses shall” and deleted “and” following “Literary Fund” in the first sentence.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 755 added present subsection C, redesignated former subsections C and D as present subsections D and E, and in present subsection E, substituted “D” for “C of this section.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 576 twice inserted “commercial co-venturer” in the introductory language of subsection B; and twice inserted “commercial co-venturer” in subsection D.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 977 and 1009 are identical, and inserted the second paragraph in subsection A.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Right to jury trial. —

In the State’s action defendants alleging violations of the Virginia Consumer Protection Act (VCPA) and the Virginia Solicitation of Contributions law (VSOC), the court held that restitution and injunctive relief under the VCPA and VSOC was an equitable principle and defendant was not entitled to a jury trial on that issue. Commonwealth v. Serv. Dogs by Warren Retrievers, 101 Va. Cir. 275, 2019 Va. Cir. LEXIS 37 (Madison County Mar. 10, 2019).

Allegations sufficient. —

Individual’s demurrer was denied as to the Attorney General’s
§

57-59

claim as the complaint adequately alleged that the corporation and individual acted as one, the word “or” in the statute expanded the class reach, and the active participation theory was available under the Virginia Solicitation of Contributions law,
§

57-48

et seq.
Commonwealth ex rel. Herring v. Serv. Dogs by Warren Retrievers, Inc., 107 Va. Cir. 333, 2021 Va. Cir. LEXIS 104 (Madison County Mar. 9, 2021).

§ 57-60.
Exemptions.

The following persons shall be exempt from the registration requirements of §

57-49

, but shall otherwise be subject to the provisions of this chapter:

Educational institutions that are accredited by the Board of Education, by a regional accrediting association or by an organization affiliated with the National Commission on Accrediting, the Association Montessori Internationale, the American Montessori Society, the Virginia Independent Schools Association, or the Virginia Association of Independent Schools, any foundation having an established identity with any of the aforementioned educational institutions, and any other educational institution confining its solicitation of contributions to its student body, alumni, faculty and trustees, and their families.

Persons requesting contributions for the relief of any individual specified by name at the time of the solicitation when all of the contributions collected without any deductions whatsoever are turned over to the named beneficiary for his use.

Charitable organizations that do not intend to solicit and receive, during a calendar year, and have not actually raised or received, during any of the three next preceding calendar years, contributions from the public in excess of $5,000, if all of their functions, including fund-raising activities, are carried on by persons who are unpaid for their services and if no part of their assets or income inures to the benefit of or is paid to any officer or member. Nevertheless, if the contributions raised from the public, whether all of such are or are not received by any charitable organization during any calendar year, shall be in excess of $5,000, it shall, within 30 days after the date it has received total contributions in excess of $5,000, register with and report to the Commissioner as required by this chapter.

Organizations that solicit only within the membership of the organization by the members thereof.

Organizations that have no office within the Commonwealth, that solicit in the Commonwealth from without the Commonwealth solely by means of telephone or telegraph, direct mail or advertising in national media, and that have a chapter, branch, or affiliate within the Commonwealth that has registered with the Commissioner.

Organizations that have been granted tax-exempt status under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that are organized wholly as Area Health Education Centers in accordance with §

32.1-122.7

.

Health care institutions defined herein as any facilities that have been granted tax-exempt status under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, and that are (i) licensed by the Department of Health or the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services; (ii) designated by the Health Care Financing Administration (HCFA) as federally qualified health centers; (iii) certified by the HCFA as rural health clinics; or (iv) wholly organized for the delivery of health care services without charge; and any supporting organization that exists solely to support any such health care institutions. For the purposes of clause (iv), “delivery of health care services without charge” includes the delivery of dental, medical or other health services where a reasonable minimum fee is charged to cover administrative costs.

Civic organizations as defined herein.

Agencies providing or offering to provide debt management plans for consumers that are licensed pursuant to Chapter 20 (§

6.2-2000

et seq.) of Title 6.2.

Agencies designated by the Virginia Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services pursuant to subdivision A 6 of §

51.5-135

as area agencies on aging.

Labor unions, labor associations and labor organizations that have been granted tax-exempt status under § 501(c)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code.

Trade associations that have been granted tax-exempt status under § 501(c)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code.

Organizations that have been granted tax-exempt status under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that are organized wholly as regional emergency medical services councils in accordance with §

32.1-111.4:2

.

Nonprofit organizations that have been granted tax-exempt status under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that solicit contributions only through (i) grant proposals submitted to for-profit corporations, (ii) grant proposals submitted to other nonprofit organizations that have been granted tax-exempt status under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, or (iii) grant proposals submitted to organizations determined to be private foundations under § 509(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.

A charitable organization shall be subject to the provisions of §§

57-57

and

57-59

, but shall otherwise be exempt from the provisions of this chapter for any year in which it confines its solicitations in the Commonwealth to five or fewer contiguous cities and counties, and in which it has registered under the charitable solicitations ordinance, if any, of each such city and county. No organization shall be exempt under this subsection if, during its next preceding fiscal year, more than 10 percent of its gross receipts were paid to any person or combination of persons, located outside the boundaries of such cities and counties, other than for the purchase of real property, or tangible personal property or personal services to be used within such localities. An organization that is otherwise qualified for exemption under this subsection that solicits by means of a local publication, or radio or television station, shall not be disqualified solely because the circulation or range of such medium extends beyond the boundaries of such cities or counties.

No charitable or civic organization shall be exempt under this section unless it submits to the Commissioner, who in his discretion may extend such filing deadline prospectively or retrospectively for good cause shown, on forms to be prescribed by him, the name, address and purpose of the organization and a statement setting forth the reason for the claim for exemption. Parent organizations may file consolidated applications for exemptions for any chapters, branches, or affiliates that they believe to be exempt from the registration provisions of this chapter. If the organization is exempted, the Commissioner shall issue a letter of exemption, which may be exhibited to the public. A registration fee of $10 shall be required of every organization requesting an exemption after June 30, 1984. The letter of exemption shall remain in effect as long as the organization continues to solicit in accordance with its claim for exemption.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as being applicable to the American Red Cross or any of its local chapters.

History.

1974, c. 574; 1975, c. 221; 1979, cc. 55, 595, 598, 626; 1980, c. 559; 1983, c. 374; 1984, c. 268; 1991, c. 184; 1995, c. 312; 1996, c. 461; 1997, c. 162; 1998, cc. 104, 232; 1999, c. 1021; 2000, c. 921; 2002, c. 85; 2003, c. 576; 2004, cc. 580, 790; 2005, c. 316; 2009, cc. 813, 840; 2010, cc. 680, 794; 2011, c. 534; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2015, cc. 502, 503.

The 1995 amendment

added subdivision (a)(9).

The 1996 amendment,

effective March 31, 1996, added subdivisions (a)(10) and (a)(11).

The 1997 amendment

inserted “the Virginia Independent Schools Association” in subdivision (a)(1).

The 1998 amendments.

The 1998 amendment by c. 104, in subsection A, rewrote subdivision 6, and in subsection B, in the first sentence, substituted “solicitations in the Commonwealth” for “solicitations in this Commonwealth.”

The 1998 amendment by c. 232, in subsection A, in subdivision 3, in the second sentence, substituted “are” for “is” in two places, and rewrote subdivision 6.

The 1999 amendment

substituted “A 6” for “(a)(7)” in subdivision A 9.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 921 rewrote subdivision A 6 which formerly read: “Health care institutions defined herein as any facility which has been (i) granted tax-exempt status under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, (ii) designated by the Health Care Financing Administration (HCFA) as a federally qualified health center, or (iii) certified by the HCFA as a rural health clinic, and any supporting organization which exists solely to support any such health care institutions.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 85 substituted “that” for “which” throughout the section; inserted present subdivision A 6; and redesignated former subdivisions A 6 through A 11 as present subdivisions A 7 through A 12.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 576 deleted “and the requirements of §

57-53

” following “§

57-49

” in the introductory language of subsection A; substituted “30” for “thirty” in subdivision A 3; substituted “10” for “ten” in subsection B; and substituted “$10” for “ten dollars” in subsection C.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 580 added subdivision A 13.

The 2004 amendment by c. 790 substituted “Chapter 10.2 (§ 6.1-363.2 et seq.) of Title 6.1” for “ § 6.1-363.1” in subdivision A 9.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 316 added subdivision A 14.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services” for “Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services” in clause (i) of subdivision A 7.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 680 added subdivision A 15.

The 2010 amendment by c. 794, effective October 1, 2010, substituted “Agencies providing or offering to provide debt management plans for consumers that are” for “Nonprofit debt counseling agencies” and “Chapter 20 (§

6.2-2000

et seq.) of Title 6.2” for “Chapter 10.2 (§ 6.1-363.2 et seq.) of Title 6.1” in subdivision A 9.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 534 deleted subdivision A 15, which read: “Veterans’ posts or veterans’ organizations that have been granted tax exempt status under § 501(c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 59, are identical, and substituted “Aging and Rehabilitative Services” for “the Aging”, and “51.5-135” for “2.2-703” in subdivision A 10.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical, and substituted “§

32.1-111.4:2

” for “§ 32.1-111.11” in subdivision A 13.

§ 57-61.
Registration of professional fund-raising counsels and solicitors.

No person shall act as a professional fund-raising counsel or professional solicitor for a charitable or civic organization, unless he has first registered with the Commissioner. Applications for registration shall be in writing under oath or affirmation in the form prescribed by the Commissioner and contain such information as he may require. The application shall be accompanied by an annual fee of $100 for the professional fund-raising counsel. The fee for a professional solicitor shall be $500. Any professional solicitor who fails to register prior to any solicitation shall be required to pay a late filing fee of $250. A partnership or corporation which is a professional fund-raising counsel or professional solicitor, may register for and pay a single fee on behalf of all its members, officers, agents and employees.

Each professional solicitor shall, at the time of making application, file with and have approved by the Commissioner a bond in which the applicant shall be the principal obligor in the sum of $20,000 with one or more sureties satisfactory to the Commissioner, whose liability in the aggregate as such sureties will at least equal $20,000, and maintain the bond in effect so long as the registration is in effect. The bond shall run to the Commonwealth of Virginia for the use of the bonds in reimbursement for any penalties or losses resulting from malfeasance, nonfeasance or misfeasance in the conduct of solicitation activities. A partnership or corporation which is a professional solicitor may file a consolidated bond on behalf of all its members, officers, agents and employees.

Each registration shall be valid throughout the Commonwealth of Virginia for a period of one year from the date of issue and may be renewed for additional one-year periods upon written application, under oath or affirmation, in the form prescribed by the Commissioner and the payment of the fee prescribed herein.

At least ten days prior to the commencement of each solicitation campaign, the solicitor shall file with the Commissioner a copy of the contract entered into with any charitable or civic organization and shall file a completed “Solicitation Notice” on forms prescribed by the Commissioner. The Solicitation Notice shall be in writing and under oath, and shall include a description of the solicitation event or campaign, the projected starting and ending dates of the campaign, and the location and telephone number from which the solicitation will be conducted. The charitable or civic organization on whose behalf the solicitor is acting shall certify that the Solicitation Notice and accompanying material are true and complete.

Professional solicitors shall file a final accounting report with the Commissioner after the completion of the solicitation campaign, showing all funds collected and such other information as the Commissioner may require. The final accounting report shall be filed within ninety days of the campaign’s completion. Professional solicitors may file a written request with the Commissioner for an extension, not to exceed ninety days, for filing the final accounting report. The extension period shall be calculated from the first day following the expiration of the initial ninety-day period for filing the report.A late filing fee of twenty-five dollars shall be imposed for each thirty-day period, or any portion thereof, that an extension request or the final accounting report is not timely filed with the Commissioner. No late fees shall be imposed for the period between the date the extension request is filed with the Commissioner through 180 days following the completion of the solicitation campaign. An additional late filing fee of twenty-five dollars shall be imposed for each thirty-day period, or any portion thereof, that the final accounting report is not filed with the Commissioner, calculated from the end of any extension period. The late filing fees shall be in addition to all other penalties authorized by law.

The solicitor shall maintain during each solicitation campaign and for not less than three years after its completion, the following records: (i) the name and address of each contributor and the date and amount of the contribution, provided that the Commissioner shall not disclose this information except to the extent necessary for investigative or law-enforcement purposes; (ii) the name and residence address of each employee, agent, or other person involved in the solicitation; (iii) records of all expenses incurred in the course of the solicitation campaign; and (iv) the account number and location of all bank accounts where receipts from the campaign will be deposited.

All funds collected by the solicitor shall be deposited in a bank account. The bank account shall include the name of the charitable or civic organization with whom the solicitor has contracted. The professional solicitor shall promptly provide to the charitable or civic organization a copy of all monthly bank statements.

Any change in information filed with the Commissioner pursuant to this section shall be reported in writing to the Commissioner within seven days after the change occurs.

History.

1974, c. 574; 1979, c. 595; 1983, c. 374; 1984, c. 268; 1987, c. 561; 1988, c. 322; 1990, c. 711; 1996, c. 461; 1999, c. 40.

Cross references.

As to requirement regarding disclosure of financial statements, see §

57-55.3

.

The 1996 amendment,

effective March 31, 1996, deleted the former third sentence of subsection D which read: “Copies of all campaign solicitation literature shall be attached to the Solicitation Notice.”

The 1999 amendment

deleted the former sixth sentence of subsection A, which read: “It shall be the responsibility of the professional solicitor to file with the Commissioner, within ninety days after completion of a solicitation campaign, a report showing all funds collected and such other information as the Commissioner may require”; inserted present subsection E and redesignated former subsections E through G as present subsections F through H.

§ 57-61.1.
Time and effect of registration.

Registrations by charitable organizations, professional solicitors, and professional fund-raising counsel are effective, if complete, upon receipt by the Commissioner. Incomplete registration forms and registration forms lacking required accompanying documents are not effective until completed or until the required accompanying documents are received by the Commissioner. No person shall be considered registered under this chapter for any purpose until his registration is complete.

If the Commissioner at any time determines that (i) the requirements of §

57-49

or §

57-61

have not been met or (ii) the registrant is violating any requirement of §§

57-54

,

57-55.2

or §

57-57

or any regulations adopted pursuant to §

57-66

, then the Commissioner may suspend the registration until the registrant meets the requirements or complies and provides evidence thereof satisfactory to the Commissioner. The suspension may be based upon an informal conference pursuant to §

2.2-4019

of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

If the Commissioner finds that the public health, safety or welfare requires urgent action, and if he also finds reasonable cause to believe that the registrant has failed to comply with §

57-49

or §

57-61

or is violating §§

57-54

,

57-55.2

or §

57-57

or any regulations adopted pursuant to §

57-66

, then the Commissioner may provide advance notice of as little as twenty-four hours for the conduct of the informal conference under §

2.2-4019

of the Administrative Process Act.

History.

1987, c. 561; 1988, c. 322; 1990, c. 711.

§ 57-61.2.
Commercial co-ventures.

No commercial co-venturer shall conduct any charitable sales promotion in the Commonwealth on behalf of a charitable or civic organization unless the charitable or civic organization is duly registered or granted the appropriate exempt status as provided by this chapter.

Prior to any charitable sales promotion in the Commonwealth, the commercial co-venturer shall have a written agreement with the charitable or civic organization on whose behalf the charitable sales promotion is to be conducted. Such agreement shall be signed by an authorized representative of the commercial co-venturer and two officers of the charitable or civic organization.

The commercial co-venturer shall maintain all records in connection with the charitable sales promotion for a period of three years after the end date of the charitable sales promotion. All such records shall be made available to the Commissioner upon request.

History.

2003, c. 576.

§ 57-62.
Liability imposed by other laws not decreased.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed as making lawful any act or omission which is now unlawful, or as decreasing the liability, civil or criminal, of any person, imposed by existing laws.

History.

1974, c. 574.